Louisiana, session 2026, HB637.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:87(F)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§87. Oilfield site restoration fees
* * *
F. The site restoration fee shall be the following:
* * *
(2) Reduced rate production such as stripper wells and incapable wells. The
site restoration fee for each respective category of oil or gas hereunder shall be in the
same proportion to the respective full rate production fees as the reduced rate
severance tax to the full rate severance tax for each respective category. reduced rate
production wells shall be as follows:
(a) The fee for oil produced from certified incapable oil wells as defined by
R.S. 47:633(A)(3)(b) shall be fifty percent of the fee imposed by Subparagraph
(1)(b) of this Subsection.
(b) The fee for oil produced from stripper oil wells as defined by R.S.
47:633(A)(3)(c)(i) and (ii) shall be twenty-five percent of the fee imposed by
Subparagraph (1)(b) of this Subsection.
(c) The fee for gas produced from low pressure oil wells as defined by R.S.
47:633(A)(5)(b) shall be forty percent of the fee imposed by Subparagraph (1)(c) of
this Subsection.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 637 ENROLLED
(d) The fee for gas production from incapable gas wells as defined by R.S.
47:633(A)(5)(c) shall be seventeen and one-half percent of the fee imposed by
Subparagraph (1)(c) of this Subsection.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.